Utah statutes.
78A-7-209.   Justice court staff to be provided.

(1)  Each county, city, or town creating and maintaining a justice court shall provide:

(a)  sufficient staff public prosecutors to attend the court and perform the duties of prosecution before the justice court;

(b)  adequate funding for the costs of defense for persons charged with a public offense who are determined by the court to be indigent under Title 77, Chapter 32; and

(c)  sufficient local peace officers to attend the justice court when required and provide security for the court.

(2)  The county attorney or district attorney may appoint city prosecutors as deputies to prosecute state offenses in municipal justice courts.

